Hawaii statutes.
§210D-7 Authority of council. The
council shall review all requests for financial assistance to assess whether
the proposed community-based economic development activity or enterprise is
likely to achieve the purposes of this chapter. The council shall make
recommendations to the department regarding the appropriateness of the proposed
activity or enterprise, and the department shall then have final authority to
approve or disapprove the application for financial assistance. [L 1990, c 111,
pt of §2; am L 1996, c 192, §7]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next